test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NID_A_NoExtra_pikwan_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: gipikwanimishinian
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: gipikwanimishiniag
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: gipikwanimishiniing
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: opikwanimishinaanan
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: opikwanimishinaanag
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: opikwanimishinaaning
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: opikwanimishiwaaan
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: opikwanimishiwaaag
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: opikwanimishiwaaing
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: opikwanimishinian
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: opikwanimishiniag
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: opikwanimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: nipikwanimishibanan
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: nipikwanimishibanag
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: nipikwanimishibaning
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: nipikwanimish***idig, idog***an
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: nipikwanimish***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: nipikwanimish***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: gipikwanimishibanan
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: gipikwanimishibanag
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: gipikwanimishibaning
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: gipikwanimish***idig, idog***an
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: gipikwanimish***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: gipikwanimish***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: opikwanimishibanan
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: opikwanimishibanag
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: opikwanimishibaning
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: opikwanimish***idig, idog***an
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: opikwanimish***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: opikwanimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: nipikwaniminaanibanan
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: nipikwaniminaanibanag
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: nipikwaniminaanibaning
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: nipikwaniminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: nipikwaniminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: nipikwaniminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nipikwanimiwaaibanan
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nipikwanimiwaaibanag
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nipikwanimiwaaibaning
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nipikwanimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nipikwanimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nipikwanimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: nipikwaniminiibanan
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nipikwaniminiibanag
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nipikwaniminiibaning
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nipikwanimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nipikwanimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nipikwanimini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: gipikwaniminaanibanan
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: gipikwaniminaanibanag
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gipikwaniminaanibaning
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gipikwaniminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gipikwaniminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gipikwaniminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gipikwanimiwaaibanan
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gipikwanimiwaaibanag
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gipikwanimiwaaibaning
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gipikwanimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gipikwanimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gipikwanimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gipikwaniminiibanan
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gipikwaniminiibanag
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gipikwaniminiibaning
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gipikwanimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gipikwanimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gipikwanimini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: opikwaniminaanibanan
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: opikwaniminaanibanag
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: opikwaniminaanibaning
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: opikwaniminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: opikwaniminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: opikwaniminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: opikwanimiwaaibanan
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: opikwanimiwaaibanag
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: opikwanimiwaaibaning
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: opikwanimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: opikwanimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: opikwanimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: opikwaniminiibanan
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: opikwaniminiibanag
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: opikwaniminiibaning
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: opikwanimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: opikwanimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: opikwanimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: nipikwanishinaanibanan
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: nipikwanishinaanibanag
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: nipikwanishinaanibaning
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: nipikwanishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: nipikwanishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: nipikwanishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nipikwanishiwaaibanan
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nipikwanishiwaaibanag
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nipikwanishiwaaibaning
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nipikwanishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nipikwanishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nipikwanishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: nipikwanishiniibanan
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nipikwanishiniibanag
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nipikwanishiniibaning
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nipikwanishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nipikwanishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nipikwanishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: gipikwanishinaanibanan
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: gipikwanishinaanibanag
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gipikwanishinaanibaning
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gipikwanishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gipikwanishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gipikwanishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gipikwanishiwaaibanan
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gipikwanishiwaaibanag
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gipikwanishiwaaibaning
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gipikwanishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gipikwanishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gipikwanishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gipikwanishiniibanan
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gipikwanishiniibanag
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gipikwanishiniibaning
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gipikwanishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gipikwanishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gipikwanishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: opikwanishinaanibanan
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: opikwanishinaanibanag
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: opikwanishinaanibaning
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: opikwanishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: opikwanishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: opikwanishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: opikwanishiwaaibanan
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: opikwanishiwaaibanag
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: opikwanishiwaaibaning
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: opikwanishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: opikwanishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: opikwanishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: opikwanishiniibanan
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: opikwanishiniibanag
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: opikwanishiniibaning
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: opikwanishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: opikwanishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: opikwanishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: pikwanensimishinaaniban
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: pikwanensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: pikwanensimishiwaaiban
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: pikwanensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: pikwanensimishiniiban
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: pikwanensimishini***idig, idog***
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: pikwanenhimishinaaniban
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: pikwanenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: pikwanenhimishiwaaiban
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: pikwanenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: pikwanenhimishiniiban
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: pikwanenhimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: pikwanensimishinaanan
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: pikwanensimishinaanag
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: pikwanensimishinaaning
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: pikwanensimishiwaaan
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: pikwanensimishiwaaag
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: pikwanensimishiwaaing
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: pikwanensimishinian
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: pikwanensimishiniag
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: pikwanensimishiniing
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: pikwanenhimishinaanan
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: pikwanenhimishinaanag
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: pikwanenhimishinaaning
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: pikwanenhimishiwaaan
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: pikwanenhimishiwaaag
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: pikwanenhimishiwaaing
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: pikwanenhimishinian
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: pikwanenhimishiniag
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: pikwanenhimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: pikwanensimishibanan
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: pikwanensimishibanag
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: pikwanensimishibaning
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: pikwanensimish***idig, idog***an
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: pikwanensimish***idig, idog***ag
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: pikwanensimish***idig, idog***ing
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: pikwanenhimishibanan
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: pikwanenhimishibanag
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: pikwanenhimishibaning
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: pikwanenhimish***idig, idog***an
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: pikwanenhimish***idig, idog***ag
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: pikwanenhimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: pikwanensiminaanibanan
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: pikwanensiminaanibanag
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: pikwanensiminaanibaning
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: pikwanensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: pikwanensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
